Maryland, session 2025, HB1365.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Commercial Law
14–4701.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(k) “Controller” means a person that, alone or jointly with others, determines the
purpose and means of processing personal data.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1365*

HOUSE BILL 1365
(w) (1) “Personal data” means any information that is linked or can be
reasonably linked to an identified or identifiable consumer.
(2) “Personal data” does not include:
(i) De–identified data; or
(ii) Publicly available information.
14–4707.
(b) (1) A controller shall:
(i) Limit the collection of personal data to what is ADEQUATE,
RELEVANT, AND reasonably necessary [and proportionate to provide or maintain a specific
product or service requested by the consumer to whom the data pertains] IN RELATION TO
THE PURPOSES FOR WHICH THE DATA IS PROCESSED, AS DISCLOSED TO THE
CONSUMER;
(ii) Establish, implement, and maintain reasonable administrative,
technical, and physical data security practices to protect the confidentiality, integrity, and
accessibility of personal data appropriate to the volume and nature of the personal data at
issue; and
(iii) Provide an effective mechanism for a consumer to revoke the
consumer’s consent under this section that is at least as easy as the mechanism by which
the consumer provided the consumer’s consent.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025, the effective dates of Chapters 424 and 425 of the Acts of the General
Assembly of 2024. If the effective dates of Chapters 424 and 425 are amended, this Act shall
take effect on the taking effect of Chapters 424 and 425.